Alaska, session 34, SB58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2026 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, unless otherwise indicated. 05 At the discretion of the Office of Management and Budget, up to $5,000,000 may be 06 transferred among appropriations within a department to address agency annual facility 07 operations, annual maintenance and repair, and periodic renewal and replacement of public 08 buildings and facilities as outlined in AS 37.07.020(e). 09 Appropriation General Other 10 Allocations Items Funds Funds 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 Legal and Advocacy Services 4,001,400 3,643,300 358,100 15 Office of Public Advocacy 2,700,300 16 Public Defender Agency 1,301,100 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 Community Residential Centers 6,970,500 6,970,500 21 Community Residential 6,970,500 22 Centers 23 Health and Rehabilitation Services 10,224,600 9,182,900 1,041,700 24 Behavioral Health Care 8,580,700 25 Substance Abuse 1,643,900 26 Treatment Program 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 Education Support and Admin Services 507,800 377,800 130,000 31 Student and School 507,800 01 Achievement 02 * * * * * * * * * * 03 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 04 * * * * * * * * * * 05 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 21,218,000 21,218,000 06 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 20,111,300 07 Facility Rent, Operations, 1,106,700 08 and Maintenance 09 Children's Services 2,226,900 2,226,900 10 Children's Services 69,500 11 Management 12 Front Line Social Workers 148,500 13 Family Preservation 726,000 14 Foster Care Augmented 500,000 15 Rate 16 Foster Care Special Need 782,900 17 Juvenile Justice 1,633,300 1,533,300 100,000 18 McLaughlin Youth Center 903,000 19 Fairbanks Youth Facility 128,400 20 Bethel Youth Facility 197,000 21 Probation Services 304,900 22 Juvenile Justice Health 100,000 23 Care 24 Departmental Support Services 7,808,700 7,312,300 496,400 25 Coordinated Health and 7,721,700 26 Complex Care 27 Commissioner's Office 87,000 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 Behavioral Health 54,369,200 52,778,500 1,590,700 01 Behavioral Health 32,904,100 02 Treatment and Recovery 03 Grants 04 Alcohol Safety Action 1,266,800 05 Program (ASAP) 06 Behavioral Health 10,160,400 07 Administration 08 Behavioral Health 5,987,300 09 Prevention and Early 10 Intervention Grants 11 Alaska Mental Health 988,900 12 Board and Advisory Board 13 on Alcohol and Drug Abuse 14 Suicide Prevention Council 610,000 15 Residential Child Care 2,088,700 16 Behavioral Health Facility 363,000 17 Operations and Maintenance 18 Health Care Services 275,500 275,500 19 Health Facilities Licensing 126,900 20 and Certification 21 Residential Licensing 148,600 22 Public Health 4,911,600 4,523,500 388,100 23 Women, Children and 2,037,400 24 Family Health 25 Emergency Programs 76,400 26 Chronic Disease Prevention 2,455,800 27 and Health Promotion 28 Bureau of Vital Statistics 70,000 29 Public Health Facility 272,000 30 Operations and Maintenance 31 Senior and Disabilities Services 12,867,100 10,920,200 1,946,900 01 Senior and Disabilities 1,180,600 02 Community Based Grants 03 Early Intervention/Infant 8,184,500 04 Learning Programs 05 Senior and Disabilities 2,293,100 06 Services Administration 07 General Relief/Temporary 740,300 08 Assisted Living 09 Commission on Aging 201,400 10 Governor's Council on 241,800 11 Disabilities and Special 12 Education 13 Senior and Disabilities 25,400 14 Services Facility 15 Operations and Maintenance 16 Medicaid Services 82,155,800 82,155,800 17 Medicaid Services 82,155,800 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 Commissioner and Administrative 25,500 25,500 22 Services 23 Labor Market Information 25,500 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 Civil Division 100,100 100,100 28 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 29 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of Law's 30 federally approved cost allocation plan. 31 Health, Safety & Welfare 100,100 01 * * * * * * * * * * 02 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 Administration & Support Services 5,721,600 5,721,600 05 Mental Health Trust Lands 5,721,600 06 Administration 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Alaska State Troopers 100,000 50,000 50,000 11 Alaska State Trooper 100,000 12 Detachments 13 Alaska Police Standards Council 80,000 80,000 14 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 15 balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 12.25.195(c), AS 12.55.039, AS 16 28.05.151, and AS 29.25.074 and receipts collected under AS 18.65.220(7). 17 Alaska Police Standards 80,000 18 Council 19 Integrated Victim Assistance 1,617,500 1,617,500 20 Council on Domestic 1,617,500 21 Violence and Sexual Assault 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 6,231,600 758,300 5,473,300 26 Mental Health Trust 5,473,300 27 Operations 28 Long Term Care 758,300 29 Ombudsman Office 30 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 200,000 200,000 31 AHFC Operations 200,000 01 * * * * * * * * * * 02 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 University of Alaska 2,875,800 1,005,800 1,870,000 05 Anchorage Campus 2,825,800 06 Troth Yeddha' Campus 50,000 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Alaska Court System 532,800 532,800 11 Trial Courts 532,800 12 Therapeutic Courts 4,655,100 4,496,800 158,300 13 Therapeutic Courts 4,655,100 14 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Administration 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 3,643,300 06 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 358,100 07 Receipts 08 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $4,001,400 09 Department of Corrections 10 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 9,182,900 11 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 1,041,700 12 Receipts 13 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 6,970,500 14 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $17,195,100 15 Department of Education and Early Development 16 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 377,800 17 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 130,000 18 Receipts 19 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $507,800 20 Department of Family and Community Services 21 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 32,290,500 22 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 596,400 23 Receipts 24 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $32,886,900 25 Department of Health 26 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 120,159,500 27 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 3,925,700 28 Receipts 29 1180 Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Treatment & 19,582,000 30 Prevention Fund 31 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 4,412,000 01 1254 Marijuana Education and Treatment Fund 6,500,000 02 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $154,579,200 03 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 04 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 25,500 05 Receipts 06 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $25,500 07 Department of Law 08 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 100,100 09 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $100,100 10 Department of Natural Resources 11 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 5,721,600 12 Receipts 13 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $5,721,600 14 Department of Public Safety 15 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 50,000 16 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 130,000 17 Receipts 18 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 1,617,500 19 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $1,797,500 20 Department of Revenue 21 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 758,300 22 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 200,000 23 Receipts 24 1094 Mental Health Trust Administration 5,473,300 25 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $6,431,600 26 University of Alaska 27 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 1,005,800 28 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 1,870,000 29 Receipts 30 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $2,875,800 31 Judiciary 01 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 4,511,600 02 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 158,300 03 Receipts 04 1180 Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Treatment & 518,000 05 Prevention Fund 06 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $5,187,900 07 * * * Total Budget * * * $231,310,400 08 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 4 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 MH Trust: Home Modification and 575,000 575,000 10 Upgrades to Retain Housing (HD 1-40) 11 MH Trust: Person Centered 250,000 250,000 12 Transportation (HD 1-40) 13 MH Trust: Essential Program Equipment 500,000 250,000 250,000 14 (HD 1-40) 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 19 MH Trust: AHFC Rural Housing 135,000 135,000 20 Coordinator - Ketchikan (HD 1-40) 21 MH Trust: AHFC Homeless Assistance 10,150,000 9,200,000 950,000 22 Program (HD 1-40) 23 MH Trust: AHFC Beneficiary and Special 1,950,000 1,750,000 200,000 24 Needs Housing (HD 1-40) 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 MH Trust: Coordinated Transportation 700,000 700,000 29 and Vehicles (HD 1-40) 30 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 3 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Health 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 825,000 06 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 500,000 07 Receipts 08 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $1,325,000 09 Department of Revenue 10 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 1,285,000 11 Receipts 12 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 10,950,000 13 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $12,235,000 14 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 15 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 700,000 16 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $700,000 17 * * * Total Budget * * * $14,260,000 18 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following summarizes by fund source the funding for appropriations made in 02 secs. 1 and 3 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 173,604,800 06 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 10,950,000 07 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $184,554,800 08 Designated General Funds 09 1180 Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Treatment & 20,100,000 10 Prevention Fund 11 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 13,000,000 12 1254 Marijuana Education and Treatment Fund 6,500,000 13 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $39,600,000 14 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 15 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized 15,942,300 16 Receipts 17 1094 Mental Health Trust Administration 5,473,300 18 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $21,415,600 19 Other Duplicated Funds 20 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $0 21 Federal Receipts 22 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $0 23 * * * Total Budget * * * $245,570,400 24 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. PURPOSE. In accordance with AS 37.14.003 and 37.14.005, the appropriations 02 made in this Act are for the state's integrated comprehensive mental health program. 03 * Sec. 7. NONGENERAL FUND RECEIPTS. (a) Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 04 authorized receipts (AS 37.14.036) or administration receipts (AS 37.14.036) that exceed the 05 amounts appropriated in this Act are appropriated conditioned upon compliance with the 06 program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). 07 (b) If Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority authorized receipts (AS 37.14.036) or 08 administration receipts (AS 37.14.036) fall short of the estimates used as the basis of the 09 appropriation, the affected appropriation is reduced by the amount of the shortfall in receipts. 10 * Sec. 8. SALARY AND BENEFIT ADJUSTMENTS. (a) The appropriations made in sec. 11 1 of this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments for public officials, officers, 12 and employees of the executive branch, Alaska Court System employees, employees of the 13 legislature, and legislators and to implement the monetary terms for the fiscal year ending 14 June 30, 2026, of the following ongoing collective bargaining agreements: 15 (1) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 16 commissioned public safety officers unit of members within the Department of Transportation 17 and Public Facilities; 18 (2) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 19 commissioned public safety officers unit of members within the Department of Public Safety; 20 (3) Public Employees Local 71, for the labor, trades, and crafts unit; 21 (4) Alaska Public Employees Association, for the supervisory unit. 22 (b) The appropriations made to the University of Alaska in sec. 1 of this Act include 23 amounts for salary and benefit adjustments for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for 24 university employees who are not members of a collective bargaining unit and to implement 25 the monetary terms for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of the following collective 26 bargaining agreements: 27 (1) Fairbanks Firefighters Union, IAFF Local 1324; 28 (2) Alaska Higher Education Crafts and Trades Employees, Local 6070; 29 (3) Alaska Graduate Workers Association/UAW. 30 (c) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (a) of this section is not ratified by 31 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit, the appropriations made in this 01 Act applicable to the collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by 02 the amount for that collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source 03 amounts are adjusted accordingly. 04 (d) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (b) of this section is not ratified by 05 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit and approved by the Board of 06 Regents of the University of Alaska, the appropriations made in this Act applicable to the 07 collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by the amount for that 08 collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source amounts are adjusted 09 accordingly. 10 (e) Appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act for salary and benefit adjustments as 11 described in (a) and (b) of this section are for the benefit of the state's integrated 12 comprehensive mental health program only and do not necessarily affect every group of 13 noncovered employees or every collective bargaining unit listed in (a) and (b) of this section. 14 * Sec. 9. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.